Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.080

Amendatory style.

Statewide ballot measures that amend existing law must be printed in the voters' pamphlet so that language proposed for deletion is enclosed by double parentheses and has a line through it. Proposed new language must be underlined. A statement explaining the deletion and addition of language must appear as follows: "Any language in double parentheses with a line through it is existing state law and will be taken out of the law if this measure is approved by voters. Any underlined language does not appear in current state law but will be added to the law if this measure is approved by voters."

[ 2003 c 111 s 808. Prior: 1999 c 260 s 6. Formerly RCW 29.81.260.]